Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 7
REGISTERED AGENT - SERVICE OF PROCESS -
CHANGE OF PRINCIPAL OFFICE

7-90-701. Registered agent.

Every domestic entity for which a constituent filed document is on file in the records of the secretary of state and every foreign entity authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state shall continuously maintain in this state a registered agent that shall be:

An individual who is eighteen years of age or older whose primary residence or usual place of business is in this state;

A domestic entity having a usual place of business in this state; or

A foreign entity authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state that has a usual place of business in this state.

An entity having a usual place of business in this state may serve as its own registered agent.

Any document delivered to the secretary of state for filing on behalf of an entity that appoints a person as the registered agent for the entity shall contain a statement that the person has consented to being so appointed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2302, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 1490, § 231, effective July 1.

7-90-702. Change or resignation of registered agent.

An entity that maintains a registered agent pursuant to this part 7 may change its registered agent, the registered agent address, or the registered agent name of its registered agent only by stating a different registered agent, different registered agent address, or different registered agent name for its registered agent, as the case may be, in one of the following:

A statement of change filed pursuant to section 7-90-305.5;

A periodic report filed pursuant to section 7-90-501; or

Any form or cover sheet filed by the secretary of state pursuant to part 3 of this article, which form or cover sheet has been prescribed by the secretary of state for effecting such change.

If the registered agent address or the registered agent name of the registered agent of an entity that is required to maintain a registered agent pursuant to this part 7 changes, the registered agent shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of change that, in addition to the information required to be stated in the statement of change pursuant to section 7-90-305.5, states that the person appointed as registered agent has delivered notice of the change to the entity.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1490, § 232, effective July 1, 2004.)

If a person appointed as the registered agent for an entity in a filed document has resigned or otherwise is no longer the registered agent, the person, or if such person is deceased or a court of competent jurisdiction has appointed a guardian or general conservator for the person, the person's executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal representative, may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of change that, in addition to the information required to be stated in the statement of change pursuant to section 7-90-305.5, states:

The registered agent name and registered agent address as contained in the records of the secretary of state;

The date on which the person resigned or otherwise ceased to be the registered agent for the entity; and

That notice of the change has been delivered to the entity.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 7-90-304, a statement of change delivered by a person pursuant to subsection (4) of this section is effective on the thirty-first day after the date that the statement of change is filed in the records of the secretary of state or on a delayed effective date stated in the statement of change effecting the resignation that is not earlier than the thirty-first day, and not later than the ninetieth day, after the date the statement of change effecting the resignation is filed in the records of the secretary of state or on the effective date of a statement of change appointing a different person as registered agent, whichever occurs first.

A statement of change pursuant to this section shall not be required to comply with section 7-90-305.5 (2)(b).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2302, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1), (2), (3), IP(4), and (4)(c) amended and (6) added, p. 1490, § 232, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(1) amended, p. 1210, § 16, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

(5) amended, p. 244, § 37, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

IP(4) and (4)(c) amended, p. 20, § 7, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1998, § 17, effective August 11.

7-90-703. Correction of registered agent.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)] A registered agent may correct either or both its registered agent address and registered agent name as contained in a document on file in the office of the secretary of state, if such information was incorrect when that document was delivered for filing, by causing to be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of correction that, in addition to the information required to be stated in the statement of correction pursuant to section 7-90-305, states that notice of the correction has been delivered to the entity.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)

]

A registered agent may correct either or both its registered agent address and registered agent name as contained in a document on file in the office of the secretary of state, if such information was incorrect when that document was delivered for filing, by causing to be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of correction that, in addition to the information required to be stated in the statement of correction pursuant to section 7-90-305, states that notice of the correction has been delivered to:

The entity; or

If the statement of correction is delivered for filing on behalf of a commercial registered agent, each entity and trademark registrant that the commercial registered agent represents. The filing of a statement of correction delivered on behalf of a commercial registered agent pursuant to this subsection (1) is effective to correct the information regarding the commercial registered agent with respect to each entity and trademark registrant represented by the commercial registered agent.

Any person appointed as the registered agent for an entity in a document on file in the office of the secretary of state may, if the person has not consented to be appointed as the registered agent or is otherwise not the registered agent for the entity, cause to be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of correction that, in addition to the information required to be stated in the statement of correction pursuant to section 7-90-305 (2)(a) and (2)(b), states:

That the person is not the registered agent for the entity; and

That the person has delivered notice of the correction to the entity.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2303, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1491, § 233, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-123), ch. 171, p. 612, § 5, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

Section 10 of chapter 171, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act amending subsection (1) is effective ninety days following certification in writing by the secretary of state to the revisor of statutes that the secretary of state has implemented the necessary computer system changes to implement said subsection. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received certification from the secretary of state.

7-90-704. Service on entities.

The registered agent of an entity is an agent of the entity authorized to receive service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the entity. The registered agent of an entity is an agent of the entity to whom the secretary of state may deliver any form, notice, or other document with respect to the entity under this title, unless otherwise specified by an organic statute.

If an entity that is required to maintain a registered agent pursuant to this part 7 has no registered agent, or if the registered agent is not located under its registered agent name at its registered agent address, or if the registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served, the entity may be served by registered mail or by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the entity at its principal address. Service is perfected under this subsection (2) at the earliest of:

The date the entity receives the process, notice, or demand;

The date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the entity; or

Five days after mailing.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving an entity in this state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2304, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1491, § 234, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(2) amended, p. 244, § 38, effective May 29.

7-90-705. Change of principal office address.

An entity that has stated a principal office address in a document filed by the secretary of state may change its principal office address only by stating a different principal office address in one of the following:

A statement of change filed pursuant to section 7-90-305.5, which statement of change shall not be required to comply with section 7-90-305.5 (2)(b);

A periodic report filed pursuant to section 7-90-501;

Any form or cover sheet filed by the secretary of state pursuant to part 3 of this article, which form or cover sheet has been prescribed by the secretary of state for effecting such change; or

A statement of dissolution or articles of dissolution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2304, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(d) added, p. 1492, § 235, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1998, § 18, effective August 11.

7-90-706. Application to dissolved or delinquent entities. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2304, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1210, § 17, effective October 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1133, § 16, effective May 14.

7-90-707. Commercial registered agent.

[Editor's note: This section is effective ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)]

A registered agent may become listed as a commercial registered agent by delivering a commercial registered agent listing statement to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article. The statement must include the registered agent name and registered agent address of the registered agent and the e-mail address of the registered agent that will be used to receive notifications from the secretary of state.

The statement must be accompanied by a list of the entities represented by the registered agent at the time the statement is filed. If the registered agent is appointed as an agent for a trademark registrant who is an individual who is not a resident of this state, the registered agent shall identify the statement of trademark registration to the satisfaction of the secretary of state.

A commercial registered agent listing statement must not state a delayed effective date.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-123), ch. 171, p. 612, § 6, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

Section 10 of chapter 171, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act adding this section is effective ninety days following certification in writing by the secretary of state to the revisor of statutes that the secretary of state has implemented the necessary computer system changes to implement this section. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received certification from the secretary of state.

7-90-708. Termination of commercial registered agent listing.

[Editor's note: This section is effective ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)]

A commercial registered agent may terminate its listing as a commercial registered agent by delivering a commercial registered agent termination statement to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article. The statement must include:

The name of the registered agent as reflected in the records of the secretary of state at the time the statement is filed;

A statement indicating that the commercial registered agent no longer serves as a commercial registered agent in this state; and

A statement indicating that notice of the termination has been delivered to each entity and trademark registrant that the commercial registered agent represents.

Notwithstanding section 7-90-304, a commercial registered agent termination statement is effective on the thirty-first day following the day that the commercial registered agent termination statement is filed in the records of the secretary of state or on a delayed effective date stated in the commercial registered agent termination statement that is not earlier than the thirty-first day and not later than the ninetieth day following the day the commercial registered agent termination statement is filed in the records of the secretary of state.

A commercial registered agent ceases to be the agent for service of process for an entity and trademark registrant formerly represented by the commercial registered agent when the termination statement becomes effective. If an entity or trademark registrant represented by the person that is resigning as a commercial registered agent appoints a registered agent before the effective date of the termination statement, the commercial registered agent ceases to be the agent for that entity or trademark registrant on the effective date of the appointment of the new registered agent.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-123), ch. 171, p. 613, § 6, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

Section 10 of chapter 171, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act adding this section is effective ninety days following certification in writing by the secretary of state to the revisor of statutes that the secretary of state has implemented the necessary computer system changes to implement this section. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received certification from the secretary of state.

7-90-709. Change of commercial registered agent name or address.

[Editor's note: This section is effective ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)]

If a commercial registered agent changes its registered agent name or its registered agent address, the commercial registered agent shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of change that states, in addition to the information required by section 7-90-305.5, that the commercial registered agent has delivered notice of the change to each entity and trademark registrant represented by the commercial registered agent.

The filing of a statement of change pursuant to this section is effective to change the information regarding the commercial registered agent with respect to each entity and trademark registrant represented by the commercial registered agent.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-123), ch. 171, p. 613, § 6, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

Section 10 of chapter 171, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act adding this section is effective ninety days following certification in writing by the secretary of state to the revisor of statutes that the secretary of state has implemented the necessary computer system changes to implement this section. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received certification from the secretary of state.

7-90-710. Listing of entities represented by commercial registered agents.

[

Editor's note: This section is effective ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)

]

The secretary of state shall make available upon request a list of filings made during the previous month that contain the name of a commercial registered agent. The secretary of state may assess a fee for the requested lists.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-123), ch. 171, p. 614, § 6, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

Section 10 of chapter 171, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act adding this section is effective ninety days following certification in writing by the secretary of state to the revisor of statutes that the secretary of state has implemented the necessary computer system changes to implement this section. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received certification from the secretary of state.